Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-3004
Mental health first aid training program; Division of Behavioral Health of Department of Health and Human Services; powers and duties.

(1) The Division of Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and Human Services may establish a mental health first aid training program, using contracts through the behavioral health regions, to help the public identify and understand the signs of a mental illness or substance abuse problem or a mental health crisis and to provide the public with skills to help a person who is developing or experiencing a mental health or substance abuse problem or a mental health crisis and to de-escalate crisis situations if needed. The training program shall provide an interactive mental health first aid training course administered by the state's regional behavioral health authorities. Instructors in the training program shall be certified by a national authority for Mental Health First Aid USA or a similar organization. The training program shall work cooperatively with local entities to provide training for individuals to become instructors.

(2) The mental health first aid training program shall be designed to train individuals to accomplish the following objectives as deemed appropriate considering the trainee's age:

(a) Help the public identify, understand, and respond to the signs of mental illness and substance abuse;

(b) Emphasize the need to reduce the stigma of mental illness; and

(c) Assist a person who is believed to be developing or has developed a mental health or substance abuse problem or who is believed to be experiencing a mental health crisis.

Laws 2014, LB901, § 5;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 160.
April 8, 2026